Louisiana, session 2026, HB917.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1664.7(F), 1664.8(A), (C), (G), and (H), 1664.9(B), (E), (F), and
(G) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 40:1664.3(82) and 1664.5(A)(15) and (16)
are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1664.3. Definitions
As used in this Subpart, the following terms have the meanings specified in
this Section:
* * *
(82) "Administrative personnel" means an individual whose primary duties
consist of routine clerical, secretarial, scheduling, or other functions that are
administrative in nature.
* * *
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 917 ENROLLED
§1664.5. Exemptions to licensure and equipment
A. The requirements for licensure shall not apply to any of the following
persons or entities:
* * *
(15) Administrative personnel who do not visit a customer's home or other
protected premise.
(16)(a) An employee of a licensed firm who sells, programs, or provides
technical support remotely, is physically located outside this state, and has passed
a criminal background check privately conducted by the licensed firm verifying that
the employee has not been convicted of a felony, received a first-time offender
pardon for a felony, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a felony charge
within the past ten years.
(b) An employee described in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph shall notify
his employer within ten days of any of the following:
(i) A change in home address.
(ii) A felony conviction.
(iii) Entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a felony charge.
(iv) Receipt of a first-time offender pardon.
(c) The state fire marshal may conduct criminal history verification of an
employee described in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph, and all costs of verifying
criminal history shall be borne by the applicant.
* * *
§1664.7. Application for an individual license; requirements to maintain
* * *
F. An individual may act as a temporary apprentice for a thirty-day calendar
period commencing on the date the state fire marshal receives an application from
the applicant. Applications for property protection endorsements shall be
accompanied by a criminal record check of the applicant. Such license shall expire
on the thirtieth calendar day after its commencement or on the date of issuance of an
apprentice or technician license, whichever is earlier.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 917 ENROLLED
§1664.8. Criminal background checks; provisional license
A. Each principal, or officer, and each designated qualifier of a firm holding
a property protection endorsement shall undergo and pass a criminal background
check prior to the firm or qualifier receiving a license pursuant to this Subpart.
* * *
C. No person or officer or principal, officer, or designated qualifier of a firm
applying for a property protection license shall have been convicted of a felony,
received a first-time offender pardon for a felony, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere to a felony charge. A person whose felony conviction has been dismissed
pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure Article 893 or the equivalent judicial
dismissal shall be eligible for property protection licensure if the conviction was not
a felony crime of violence specifically enumerated in R.S. 14:2(B), a sex offense as
defined in R.S. 15:541(24)(a), with the exception of R.S. 14:92(A)(7) and R.S.
14:80, or a felony offense against property as enumerated in R.S. 14:51 through 62.8.
* * *
G. The office of state fire marshal, code enforcement and building safety,
may consider the seriousness and circumstances of the offense and subsequent
arrests and convictions pursuant to this Section.
H. The state fire marshal is authorized to order fingerprint analysis criminal
background checks or any other analysis or documents deemed necessary by the state
fire marshal for the purpose of verifying the criminal history of a person or named
officer or principal, officer, or designated qualifier principal of a firm applying for
a property protection license. The state fire marshal shall have the authority to
conduct criminal history verification on a local, state, or national level. All costs for
verifying criminal history shall be borne by the applicant.
* * *
§1664.9. Fees; license endorsements for firms and persons employees;
certifications; Louisiana Life Safety and Property Protection Trust Dedicated
Fund Account
* * *
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 917 ENROLLED
B. The amount of Life Safety and Property Protection licensing fees for a
firm shall be as follows:
FIRM ENDORSEMENT
Initial Fee: $1,200
Renewal: $375
EMPLOYEE ENDORSEMENT:
Initial Fee: $300
Renewal Fee: $150
Firm endorsement Initial fee Renewal fee
(1)(a) Technical Endorsement-Locksmith $250 $50
(b) Specialty Endorsement:
(i) Bank locking $250 $50
(ii) Detention locking $250 $50
(iii) Limited Locksmith $250 $50
(iv) Automotive Locksmith $250 $50
(2) Technical Endorsement-Door hardware $250 $50
(3)(a) Technical Endorsement-Security $250 $50
(b) Specialty Endorsement:
(i) Closed Circuit Television $250 $50
(ii) Household fire $250 $50
(iii) Special Locking $250 $50
(iv) Limited Security $250 $50
(4) Technical Endorsement-Fire Sprinkler $500 $250
(5)(a) Technical Endorsement- $350 $100
Fixed Fire Suppression
(b) Specialty Endorsement:
(i) Pre-engineered $350 $100
(ii) Kitchen suppression $350 $50
(6)(a) Technical Endorsement-Fire Alarm $350 $100
(b) Specialty Endorsement:
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 917 ENROLLED
(i) Fire alarm (Non-required) $350 $50
(ii) Fire alarm owner $350 $50
(7) Technical Endorsement- $350 $150
Portable Fire Extinguishers/Hoses
(8) Technical Endorsement- $350 $50
DOT hydrostatic testing
C. The amount of licensing fees for a person are as follows:
Employee endorsement Initial fee Renewal fee
(1)(a) Technical Endorsement-Locksmith $100 $50
(b) Specialty Endorsement:
(i) Bank locking $100 $50
(ii) Detention locking $100 $50
(iii) Limited Locksmith $100 $50
(iv) Automotive Locksmith $100 $50
(2) Technical Endorsement-Door hardware
specialist $100 $50
(3)(a) Technical Endorsement-Security $100 $50
(b) Specialty Endorsement:
(i) Closed Circuit Television $100 $50
(ii) Household fire $100 $50
(iii) Security sales $100 $50
(iv) Special Locking $100 $50
(v) Limited Locksmith $100 $50
(vi) Limited Security $100 $50
(4) Technical Endorsement- $100 $50
Fire Sprinkler Qualifier
(5) Technical Endorsement- $100 $50
Fire Sprinkler Inspector
(6)(a) Technical Endorsement- $50 $50
Fixed Fire Suppression
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 917 ENROLLED
(b) Specialty Endorsement:
(i) Pre-engineered $50 $50
(ii) Kitchen suppression $50 $50
(7)(a) Technical Endorsement-Fire Alarm $50 $50
(b) Specialty Endorsement:
(i) Fire alarm (Non-required) $50 $50
(ii) Fire alarm owner $50 $50
(8) Technical Endorsement- $50 $50
Portable Fire Extinguishers/Hoses
(9) Technical Endorsement- $25 $25
DOT hydrostatic testing
(10) Specialty Endorsement-Apprentice $50 $50
(11) Technical Endorsement - Conveyance Device
(a) Conveyance Device Inspector $100 $50
(b) Conveyance Device Mechanic $100 $50
(12) Speciality Endorsement-
Limited Conveyance Device Mechanic $100 $50
(13) Conveyance device inspection fee $150 $150
* * *
E. All licenses are valid for one year three years, unless a multi-year license
is created, and shall be renewed within thirty days of its expiration date to remain
valid. The state fire marshal may create a prorated fee system to allow employee
license renewal dates to coincide with the firm license renewal date.
F. A license not renewed within thirty days of before its expiration date shall
be invalid and considered past due and subject to late fees. The late fee penalty shall
be twenty-five dollars for a license not renewed before thirty-one to forty-five days
past the expiration date and fifty dollars for a license not renewed before forty-six
to sixty days past the expiration date. After a license has expired, the person to whom
the license was issued shall have fifteen days following the expiration date to file an
application for renewal of the license without the payment of a late fee. Any person
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 917 ENROLLED
who makes an application for the renewal of a license after fifteen days following the
expiration date of the license shall be charged, in addition to the renewal fee, a late
fee not exceeding one hundred twenty-five dollars.
G. A license shall be suspended if not renewed within sixty days of its
expiration date or if the license holder has not maintained the license. The cost to
reinstate a suspended license shall be the cost of the initial fees plus twenty dollars.
If a license is not renewed within a period of one year from the date of expiration,
it is no longer eligible for renewal. An application for a new license may be
submitted and, upon approval, a new license issued. A license that is not renewed
within one year of its expiration date will require a criminal background check at the
time of application. A license or endorsement based on certifications, education, or
credentials shall expire upon the expiration date of the certification, education, or
credentials.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 40:1664.3(22), 1664.8(B) and (I), 1664.9(J), and 1664.17 are hereby
repealed in their entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.